Massachusetts, session 194th, S241.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 58 of chapter 23K of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following sentences:-
The Department of Public Health shall make annual reports to the Speaker of the House,
the President of the Senate, the Joint Committee on Public Health, the Joint Committee on
Economic Development and Emerging Technologies on its treatment programs funded by the
fund, including but not limited to: (i) the treatment programs funded by the Fund and the
amounts they receive; (ii) the number of individuals served by each treatment program funded by
the Fund, including whether they are new clients or continuing clients in the programs; (iii)
demographic information of those served by treatment programs funded by the fund, including
but not limited to the variables of sex, age, race, ethnicity, income, education, geography; and
(iv) the outcomes obtained for individuals enrolled in treatment programs funded by the Fund.
of 1